Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5321XS (9) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2357 Section 1. Section 4.1, subsection 20, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 20. Person. Unless otherwise provided by law, âpersonâ 3 means individual, corporation, limited liability company, 4 government or governmental subdivision or agency, business 5 trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other 6 legal entity. âPersonâ , whenever the term is used or implied by 7 construction or context, shall include an individual organism 8 of the species homo sapiens at any stage of development from 9 fertilization until natural death. This subsection shall not 10 be subject to judicial review. 11